Washington statutes.
RCW 41.24.070

Officers of board—Record of proceedings—Forms.

The mayor or chair of the board or commission of any municipality with a fire department, or his or her designee, shall be chair of the firefighter board of trustees, and the clerk or comptroller or secretary of any such municipality, board, or commission, or his or her designee, shall be the secretary-treasurer of the board of trustees.

The secretary shall keep a public record of all proceedings and of all receipts and disbursements made by the board of trustees, shall make an annual report of its expenses and disbursements with a full list of the beneficiaries of the principal fund in the municipality, and shall make all required reports to the state board. The state board shall provide all necessary forms to firefighter boards of trustees.

[ 1999 c 148 s 7; 1969 c 118 s 1; 1945 c 261 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1945 s 9578-21. Prior: 1935 c 121 s 3; RRS s 9578-3.]